Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-1102
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Preventing Lethal Agricultural and National Threats Act:

(1) Department means the Department of Agriculture; and

(2) High-risk agricultural pathogen or pest means:

(a) Any disease or pest included in the list of diseases or pests of concern, as such list existed on January 1, 2026, established by the Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service of the United States Department of Agriculture pursuant to 7 U.S.C. 8914; and

(b) Any agent, toxin, or organism designated under section 2-1105 as a high-risk agricultural pathogen or pest.

Laws 2026, LB1096, § 2.
July 18, 2026